Hawaii, session 2025, GM1381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that many Hawaii
residents continue to face challenges paying their rent. This
is a problem for both housing providers and tenants because
tenants risk losing their homes due to nonpayment, and housing
providers risk losing their property or not keeping up with
their bills because of the nonpayment.
Act 57, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021 (Act 57), encouraged
communication and facilitated mediation between housing
providers and tenants to help encourage collaborative solutions
to this common problem and to avoid evictions when possible.
Experience shows that the mediation procedures created by Act 57
were widely successful in substantially increasing the number of
disputes that were settled in mediation without any eviction
cases being filed and increased the number of settlements in
which the parties agreed that the tenant could continue to
reside in the dwelling unit. However, the amendments to the
Residential Landlord-Tenant Code by Act 57 have expired.
2025-2817 SB825 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to encourage
landlords and tenants to engage in conversations early, as soon
as tenants know they are not able to make their full rent
payment, by:
(1) Establishing a two-year pilot program that adopts the
most effective provisions of Act 57 that:
(A) Extends the period for a notice of termination of
the rental agreement from five business days to
ten calendar days;
(B) Requires all landlords, or landlords' agents, and
tenants to engage in early mediation and delay
filing an action for summary possession if a
tenant schedules mediation;
(C) Requires landlords, or landlords' agents, and
tenants to be responsible for their own
attorneys' fees and costs in prelitigation
mediation, and allows the landlord or landlord's
agent to file an action for summary possession
and payment of all attorneys' fees and costs
incurred in the prelitigation mediation process
2025-2817 SB825 GDI SMA-l.docx 2
■liHilllllilllHIIIIIIM

Page 3
S.B. NO. --
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
if the tenant defaults on a mediated agreement;
and
(D) Requires landlords and landlords' agents to
provide specific information in the
ten-calendar-day notice to tenants, which shall
also be provided to a mediation center that
offers free mediation for residential
landlord-tenant disputes; and
(2) Appropriating funds to the judiciary for the
prelitigation mediation pilot program.
SECTION 2. Section 521-68, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§521-68 Landlord's remedies for failure by tenant to pay
rent[—]; prelitigation mediation. (a) A landlord or the
landlord's agent [may], any time after rent is due, may demand
payment thereof and notify the tenant in writing that unless
payment is made within a time mentioned in the notice, not less
than [five busincso] ten calendar days after receipt thereof,
the rental agreement will be terminated. [If the tenant CQni=tet
bo served- with notice as- required,—notice] Notice may be given
to the tenant by posting the same in a conspicuous place on the
2025-2817 SB825 CDl SMA-l.docx
■iiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 4 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
dwelling unit[-], and the notice shall be deemed received on the
date of the posting. If the notice is mailed to the tenant by
United States Postal Service, properly addressed and with
appropriate postage, the notice shall be deemed to have been
received two business days after the date of the postmark,
unless the letter is returned to the landlord or landlord's
agent as undeliverable. If the tenant remains in default[—]
after the expiration of the time stated in the notice, the
landlord may [thereafter] bring a summary proceeding for
possession of the dwelling unit or any other proper proceeding,
action, or suit for possession[—], subject to this section. The
notice required by this section need not be given if the action
is based on the breach of a mediated agreement or other
settlement agreement, or is for a summary proceeding for
possession based on matters other than nonpayment of rent. In
any action based on the breach of a mediated agreement, the
court shall not require any further mediation before trial.
(b) The- ten-calendar-day notice required under subsection
(a) shall include the following:
(1) The name of the landlord or landlord's agent and the
landlord's or landlord's agent's contact information,
2025-2817 SB825 GDI SMA-l.docx
imimiiiinniiiniiiiiiinMi

Page 5 S.B. NO. S.2
C.D. 1
including, if possible, phone number, electronic mail
address, and mailing address;
(2) The address of the dwelling unit subject to the rental
agreement;
(3) The name and contact information of all tenants listed
on the rental agreement, including phone number and,
if possible, electronic mail address and mailing
address;
(4) The current amount of the rent due as of the date of
the notice, after applying all rent paid from all
sources;
(5) Notice that a copy of the ten-calendar-day notice
being provided to the tenant is also being provided to
a state-funded mediation center for the mediation
center to contact the landlord, or landlord's agent,
and tenant to schedule a mediation regarding the
nonpayment of rent in accordance with subsection (c);
(6) Notice that the landlord or landlord's agent may file
an action for summary possession if the rent due is
not paid and if mediation is not scheduled within ten
calendar days after the tenant's receipt of the
2025-2817 SB825 CDl SMA-l.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO.
CD. 1
ten-calendar-day notice, regardless of whether the
scheduled mediation session occurs within the ten
calendar days;
(7) A warning in bold typeface print in substantially the
following form; "If mediation is not scheduled within
ten calendar days after receipt of this notice,
regardless of whether the scheduled mediation session
occurs within the ten-calendar-day period, the
landlord or landlord's agent may file an action for
summary possession after the expiration of the
ten-calendar-day period. If mediation is scheduled
before the expiration of the ten-calendar-day period,
regardless of whether the scheduled mediation session
occurs within the ten calendar days, the landlord or
landlord's agent shall only file an action for summary
possession after the expiration of twenty calendar
days following the tenant's receipt of the
ten-calendar-day notice unless you (tenant) fail to
attend or cancel mediation. If the ten-calendar-day
notice was posted on the premises, receipt of notice
shall be deemed to be the date of posting. If the
2025-2817 SB825 GDI SMA-l.docx 6

Page 7 825
SB. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
ten-calendar-day notice was mailed, receipt of notice
shall be deemed to be two business days after the date
of the postmark. If filing an action for summary
possession, the landlord or landlord's agent shall be
required to note, in the summary possession complaint,
the status of the mediation or settlement effort and
proof of posting or sending the ten-calendar-day
notice to the mediation center."; and
(8) Notice that the landlord or landlord's agent shall
engage in mediation if mediation is scheduled.
The judiciary shall prepare a notice form that may be used
by landlords and landlords' agents to provide the information
required by this subsection and make the form available on its
website.
(c) A landlord or the landlord's agent shall provide the
ten-calendar-day notice to a state-funded mediation center that
offers free mediation for residential landlord-tenant matters.
All state-funded mediation centers shall offer mediation
services to landlords, or landlords' agents, and tenants through
in-person and remote means, and shall allow mediation
participants to utilize remote appearances, if requested. If a
2025-2817 SB825 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 8 S.B. NO 825
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
CD. 1
mediation center schedules mediation within the ten-calendar-day
period and the tenant participates in the mediation, regardless
of whether the scheduled mediation session occurs within the
ten-calendar-day period, the landlord or landlord's agent shall
only file a summary possession proceeding after the expiration
of twenty calendar days from the date of the tenant's receipt of
the ten-calendar-day notice, unless the tenant fails to appear
at mediation or cancels the mediation. If the tenant schedules
mediation, the landlord or landlord's agent shall participate.
Mediation shall take place within thirty days from the date that
the mediation center makes contact with both the landlord, or
the landlord's agent, and tenant. Upon request by the landlord
or landlord's agent, the mediation center shall provide copies
of a document or documents verifying that the landlord or
landlord's agent provided a copy of the required
ten-calendar-day notice to the mediation center.
(d) The summary possession complaint for nonpayment of
rent shall include:
(1) A document or documents from the state-funded
mediation center verifying that the landlord or
landlord's agent provided a copy of the required
2025-2817 SB825 GDI SMA-l.docx 8
iiiiliUNiiMiiiiiiiiiiiinniiiiii

Page 9 S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
ten-calendar-day notice to the mediation center or an
affirmation from the landlord or landlord's agent that
the notice was provided to the applicable mediation
center and the means by which the notice was provided
to the applicable mediation center. Upon request by
the landlord or landlord's agent, the mediation center
shall provide copies of the relevant documents to the
landlord or landlord's agent; and
(2) If mediation is scheduled but has not yet occurred,
the date on which the mediation is scheduled.
(e) If there is any defect in the ten-calendar-day notice
described in subsection (b) provided by the landlord or
landlord's agent and the court determines the defect was
unintentional or immaterial, the court may allow the landlord or
landlord's agent to cure the defect without dismissing the
action for summary possession.
(f) Nothing in this section shall impact a landlord's or
tenant's other rights and responsibilities under this chapter.
(g) The mediation may take place using remote
communication, in person, or both.
2025-2817 SB825 GDI SMA-l.docx 9
inniiiiiiMiiiiiHiiiiiiiinii

Page 10
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(h) Each landlord and tenant shall be responsible for
bearing the party's own costs, including attorneys’ fees,
relating to the mediation; provided that if the tenant defaults
on a mediated agreement or fails to attend a scheduled
mediation, the landlord or landlord's agent may reguest payment
of all costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, incurred
during the pre-litigation mediation process.
(i) If the mediation does not result in an agreement, the
landlord or the landlord's agent may file an action for summary
possession without participating in an additional mediation;
provided that:
(1) The landlord or landlord's agent shall only file a
summary possession proceeding after the expiration of
twenty calendar days from the date of the tenant's
receipt of the ten-calendar-day notice; and
(2) After the filing of the action for summary possession,
the court, in its discretion and based on a finding of
good cause, may order an additional mediation.
[-{tel-] (j) A landlord or the landlord's agent may bring an
action solely for rent [a-tene] at any time after the landlord
2025-2817 SB825 CDl SMA-l.docx 10

Page 11 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
has demanded payment of past due rent and notified the tenant of
the landlord's intention to bring [-sueh—aft] the action."
SECTION 3. No later than ninety days after the termination
of the pilot program established by this Act, the judiciary
shall submit to the legislature a report of its findings and
recommendations, including recommendations on whether the pilot
program should be made permanent, and any proposed legislation.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $1,250,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 for the judiciary to contract for mediation services
pursuant to section 2 of this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary
for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-2817 SB825 CDl SMA-l.docx 11

Page 12 S.B. NO. S.2
C.D. 1
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025;
provided that:
(1) Section 2 shall take effect on February 5, 2026; and
(2) This Act shall be repealed on February 4, 2028, and
section.521-68, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be
reenacted in the form in which it read on the day
prior to the effective date of section 2 of this Act;
provided further that the amendments made to section
521-68(a), Hawaii Revised Statutes, by section 2 of
this Act shall not be repealed when that section is
reenacted on February 4, 2028.
2025-2817 SB825 CDl SMA-l.docx 12

825
S.B. NO.
CO
X
O
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this 2nd day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 825, S.D. 2, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
218

SB No. 825, SD 2, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives